Montana, session 2025, LC0657.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

Section 1. Section 2-18-502, MCA, is amended to read:
"2-18-502. Computation of meal allowance. (1) Except as provided in 5-2-302 and subsections (2)
and (4) of this section, an employee is eligible for the meal allowance provided in 2-18-501, only if the
employee is in a travel status for more than 3 continuous hours during the following hours:
(a) for the morning meal allowance, between the hours of 12:01 a.m. and 10 a.m.;
(b) for the midday meal allowance, between the hours of 10:01 a.m. and 3 p.m.; and
(c) for the evening meal allowance, between the hours of 3:01 p.m. and 12 midnight.
(2) An eligible employee may receive:
(a) only one of the three meal allowances provided, if the travel was performed within the
employee's assigned travel shift; or
(b) a maximum of two meal allowances if the travel begins before or was completed after the
employee's assigned travel shift and the travel did not exceed 24 hours.
(3) "Travel shift" is that period of time beginning 1 hour before and terminating 1 hour after the
employee's normally assigned work shift.
(4) An appointed member of a state board, commission, or council or a member of a legislative
subcommittee or select or interim committee is entitled to a midday meal allowance on a day the individual is
attending a meeting of the board, commission, or council, or committee, regardless of proximity of the meeting
place to the individual's residence or headquarters. This subsection does not apply to a member of a legislative
committee during a legislative session.
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0657.1
(5) The department of administration shall prescribe policies necessary to effectively administer
this section for state government."

Section 2. Section 5-2-302, MCA, is amended to read:
"5-2-302. Compensation and expenses when legislature not in session. When the legislature is
not in session, a member of the legislature, while engaged in legislative business authorized interim, interim
budget, or administrative committee legislative business or as otherwise provided by law, and with prior
authorization of the appropriate funding authority, is entitled to: compensation and expenses as set forth in this
section.
(1) A legislator participating remotely is entitled to a salary equal to one full day's pay at the rate
described in 5-2-301(1) for each 24-hour period.
(2) A legislator attending a meeting in person is entitled to the following compensation and
expenses based on the number of round-trip miles from the legislator's residence to the meeting:
(a) for 100 miles or less:
(i) a salary equal to one full day's pay at the rate described in 5-2-301(1) for each 24-hour period;
(ii) a mileage allowance as provided in 2-18-503; and
(iii) a meal allowance for one midday meal as provided in 2-18-501;
(b) for more than 100 miles and less than 400 miles:
(i) a salary equal to two full days' pay at the rate described in 5-2-301(1);
(ii) a mileage allowance as provided in 2-18-503;
(iii) a meal allowance for two morning meals, two midday meals, and two evening meals as
provided in 2-18-501; and
(iv) two nights' lodging reimbursed at the prescribed maximum standard federal rate for each day
for the location; or
(c) for 400 miles or more:
(i) a salary equal to three full days' pay at the rate described in 5-2-301(1);
(ii) a mileage allowance as provided in 2-18-503;
(iii) a meal allowance for three morning meals, three midday meals, and three evening meals as
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – ****

****
69th Legislature 2025 LC0657.1
provided in 2-18-501; and
(iv) two nights' lodging reimbursed at the prescribed maximum standard federal rate for each day
for the location.
(2) expenses as provided in 2-18-501 and 2-18-502 ; and
(3) a salary equal to one full day's pay at the rate described in 5-2-301 (1) for each 24-hour period
of time (from midnight to midnight), or portion of a 24-hour period, spent on authorized interim, interim budget,
or administrative committee legislative business or as otherwise provided by law. However, if
(3) For each additional consecutive day of legislative meetings or authorized legislative business,
a legislator attending in person is entitled to the following additional compensation and expenses based on the
number of round-trip miles from the legislator's residence to the meeting location:
(a) for 100 miles or less:
(i) a salary equal to one full day's pay at the rate described in 5-2-301(1);
(ii) a mileage allowance as provided in 2-18-503; and
(iii) a meal allowance for one morning meal, one midday meal, and one evening meal as provided
in 2-18-501; or
(b) for more than 100 miles:
(i) a salary equal to one full day's pay at the rate described in 5-2-301(1);
(ii) a meal allowance for one morning meal, one midday meal, and one evening meal as provided
in 2-18-501; and
(iii) an additional night's lodging reimbursed at the prescribed maximum standard federal rate for
each day for the location.
(4) If time spent for business other than authorized legislative interim, interim budget, or
administrative committee business or business related to 5-11-305 results in lengthening a legislator's stay
away from home into an additional 24-hour period, the legislator may not be compensated for the additional
day."

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – ****